Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-243
Certificates; signature; execution.

(a) Any person may sign any certificate required by sections 67-240 to 67-248 to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, a partnership agreement, or an amendment thereof by an attorney in fact. Powers of attorney relating to the signing of a certificate, partnership agreement, or amendment thereof by an attorney in fact need not be sworn to, verified, or acknowledged and need not be filed in the office of the Secretary of State but shall be retained by the person or persons exercising such powers of attorney.

(b) The execution of a certificate by a general partner constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that, to the best of the general partner's knowledge and belief, the facts stated in the certificate are true.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 11;

Laws 1982, LB 589, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 16.